Nebraska, session 109, LB1038.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 9-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1204 Of the tax imposed by section 9-1203, seventy-five percent
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Two and
one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, two and one-
half percent to the General Fund, and seventy percent to the Education
Future Property Tax Credit Cash Fund. The remaining twenty-five percent
of the tax shall be remitted to the county treasurer of the county in
which the licensed racetrack enclosure is located to be distributed as
follows: (1) If the licensed racetrack enclosure is located completely
within an unincorporated area of a county, the remaining twenty-five
percent shall be distributed to the county in which such licensed
racetrack enclosure is located; or (2) if the licensed racetrack
enclosure is located at least partially within the limits of a city or
village in such county, one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent
shall be distributed to such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-
five percent to the city or village in which such licensed racetrack
enclosure is at least partially located.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3012 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section, a tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the amount and in
accordance with this section, upon the net operating revenue of all cash
devices operating within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain either
directly or indirectly received. The tax shall be paid in the amount and
manner specified in this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
beginning on and after July 1, 2025, any distributor of a cash device,
and any operator of a cash device if the operator is not subject to a
revenue-sharing or other agreement with a distributor who is paying the
tax, shall pay a tax for each cash device in operation each calendar
-2-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
quarter during the taxable year. The tax shall be collected by the
department and due and payable on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October
1 of each year on each cash device in operation during the preceding
calendar quarter. For each cash device put into operation on a date
subsequent to a quarterly due date that has not been included in
computing the tax imposed and levied by the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, the tax shall be due and payable on the immediately succeeding
quarterly due date.
(3) The amount of the tax imposed and levied under this section
shall be five percent of the net operating revenue for each cash device.
The quarterly tax shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner documenting the total gross and net operating revenue for
that quarter.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the taxes collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Twenty percent to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund for
enforcement of the act and maintenance of the central server;
(b) Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund;
(c) Two and one-half percent to the General Fund;
(d) Ten percent to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash
Fund;
(e) Forty percent to the Education Future Property Tax Credit Cash
Fund; and
(f) The remaining twenty-five percent to the county treasurer of the
county in which the cash device is located to be distributed as follows:
(i) If the cash device is located completely within an unincorporated
area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed
to the county in which the cash device is located, or (ii) if the cash
device is located within the limits of a city or village in such county,
one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to
-3-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be
distributed to the city or village in which such cash device is located.
(5) This section does not apply to cash devices operated by a
fraternal benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072
to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3442 (1) Property tax levies for the support of local governments
for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 1998, shall be limited to
the amounts set forth in this section except as provided in section
77-3444.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (2)(b) and (2)(e) of this
section, school districts and multiple-district school systems may levy a
maximum levy of:
(i) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2026-27, one dollar and
five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property
subject to the levy; and .
(ii) For fiscal year 2026-27 and each fiscal year thereafter, fifty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy.
(b) For each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, learning
communities may levy a maximum levy for the general fund budgets of
member school districts of ninety-five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The proceeds from the
levy pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed pursuant to
section 79-1073.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, for
each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, school districts that are
members of learning communities may levy for purposes of such districts'
general fund budget and special building funds a maximum combined levy of
-4-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
the difference of one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars
of taxable property subject to the levy minus the learning community levy
pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section for such learning
community.
(d) Excluded from the limitations in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(c)
of this section are (i) amounts levied to pay for current and future sums
agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring prior to
September 1, 2017, (ii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for current and future qualified voluntary termination incentives for
certificated teachers pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d)
of this section, (iii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for seventy-five percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid
to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of
employment occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31, 2018, as a
result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on
September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an exclusion
pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iv) amounts levied by a
school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a) of this section to pay for fifty percent of the current and future
sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2018,
and August 31, 2019, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in
force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in
an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (v) amounts
levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for twenty-five percent of the
current and future sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in
-5-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring between
September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are
not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of
this section, (vi) amounts levied in compliance with sections 79-10,110
and 79-10,110.02, (vii) amounts levied pursuant to section 26 of this
act, (viii) amounts levied pursuant to section 79-10,120, and (ix) (vii)
amounts levied to pay for special building funds and sinking funds
established for projects commenced prior to April 1, 1996, for
construction, expansion, or alteration of school district buildings. For
purposes of this subsection, commenced means any action taken by the
school board on the record which commits the board to expend district
funds in planning, constructing, or carrying out the project.
(e) Federal aid school districts may exceed the maximum levy
prescribed by subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(c) of this section only to the
extent necessary to qualify to receive federal aid pursuant to Title VIII
of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001. For
purposes of this subdivision, federal aid school district means any
school district which receives ten percent or more of the revenue for its
general fund budget from federal government sources pursuant to Title
VIII of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001.
(f) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one-half cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable property
subject to the levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for
remodeling of leased elementary learning center facilities, and for up to
fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital
projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant
to section 79-2111.
(g) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable
property subject to the levy for early childhood education programs for
-6-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
children in poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for
contracts with other entities or individuals who are not employees of the
learning community for elementary learning center programs and services,
and for pilot projects, except that no more than ten percent of such levy
may be used for elementary learning center employees.
(3) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2023-24, community
college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(c) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. For fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter,
community college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)
(a) and (b) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. A community college area may exceed the levy provided in
subdivision (2)(a) of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to generate
sufficient revenue as described in section 85-1543 or 85-2238. A
community college area may exceed the levy provided in subdivision (2)(b)
of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to retire general obligation
bonds assumed by the community college area or issued pursuant to section
85-1515 according to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation
pursuant to section 85-1535 entered into prior to January 1, 1997.
(4)(a) Natural resources districts may levy a maximum levy of four
and one-half cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy.
(b) Natural resources districts shall also have the power and
authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities under the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04,
not to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation
annually on all of the taxable property within the district.
-7-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(c) In addition, natural resources districts located in a river
basin, subbasin, or reach that has been determined to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated
pursuant to section 46-713 by the Chief Water Officer of the Department
of Water, Energy, and Environment shall also have the power and authority
to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their restricted funds
budgeted to administer and implement ground water management activities
and integrated management activities under the Nebraska Ground Water
Management and Protection Act exceed their restricted funds budgeted to
administer and implement ground water management activities and
integrated management activities for FY2005-06, not to exceed three cents
on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation on all of the taxable
property within the district for fiscal year 2006-07 and each fiscal year
thereafter through fiscal year 2017-18.
(5) Any educational service unit authorized to levy a property tax
pursuant to section 79-1225 may levy a maximum levy of one and one-half
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy.
(6)(a) Incorporated cities and villages which are not within the
boundaries of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of forty-five
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy plus an additional five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation to provide financing for the municipality's share of revenue
required under an agreement or agreements executed pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum
levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library
pursuant to section 51-201, museum pursuant to section 51-501, visiting
community nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to
section 71-1637, or statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section
80-202.
(b) Incorporated cities and villages which are within the boundaries
-8-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of ninety cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The
maximum levy shall include amounts paid to a municipal county for county
services, amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to
section 51-201, a museum pursuant to section 51-501, a visiting community
nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to section
71-1637, or a statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section 80-202.
(7) Sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence
for more than five years may levy a maximum levy of forty cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, and
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less shall not have a maximum levy. Unconsolidated sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for more than five
years and are located in a municipal county may levy a maximum of eighty-
five cents per hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy.
(8) Counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of fifty cents per
one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy,
except that five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy may only be levied to provide financing for
the county's share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements
executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act. The maximum levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums
to support a library pursuant to section 51-201 or museum pursuant to
section 51-501. The county may allocate up to fifteen cents of its
authority to other political subdivisions subject to allocation of
property tax authority under subsection (1) of section 77-3443 and not
specifically covered in this section to levy taxes as authorized by law
which do not collectively exceed fifteen cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on any parcel or item of taxable property. The county
may allocate to one or more other political subdivisions subject to
-9-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
allocation of property tax authority by the county under subsection (1)
of section 77-3443 some or all of the county's five cents per one hundred
dollars of valuation authorized for support of an agreement or agreements
to be levied by the political subdivision for the purpose of supporting
that political subdivision's share of revenue required under an agreement
or agreements executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the
Joint Public Agency Act. If an allocation by a county would cause another
county to exceed its levy authority under this section, the second county
may exceed the levy authority in order to levy the amount allocated.
(9) Municipal counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of one
dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy. The municipal county may allocate levy authority to any
political subdivision or entity subject to allocation under section
77-3443.
(10) Beginning July 1, 2016, rural and suburban fire protection
districts may levy a maximum levy of ten and one-half cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy if
(a) such district is located in a county that had a levy pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section in the previous year of at least forty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) such district had a levy request pursuant to section
77-3443 in any of the three previous years and the county board of the
county in which the greatest portion of the valuation of such district is
located did not authorize any levy authority to such district in such
year.
(11) A regional metropolitan transit authority may levy a maximum
levy of ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy for each fiscal year that commences on the
January 1 that follows the effective date of the conversion of the
transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law into the
regional metropolitan transit authority.
-10-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(12) Property tax levies (a) for judgments, except judgments or
orders from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a
political subdivision which require or obligate a political subdivision
to pay such judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by
liability insurance coverage of a political subdivision, (b) for
preexisting lease-purchase contracts approved prior to July 1, 1998, (c)
for bonds as defined in section 10-134 approved according to law and
secured by a levy on property except as provided in section 44-4317 for
bonded indebtedness issued by educational service units and school
districts, (d) for payments by a public airport to retire interest-free
loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of
Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the
public airport, and (e) to pay for cancer benefits provided on or after
January 1, 2022, pursuant to the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act are not
included in the levy limits established by this section.
(13) The limitations on tax levies provided in this section are to
include all other general or special levies provided by law.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the only exceptions to the
limits in this section are those provided by or authorized by sections
77-3442 to 77-3444.
(14) Tax levies in excess of the limitations in this section shall
be considered unauthorized levies under section 77-1606 unless approved
under section 77-3444.
(15) For purposes of sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, political
subdivision means a political subdivision of this state and a county
agricultural society.
(16) For school districts that file a binding resolution on or
before May 9, 2008, with the county assessors, county clerks, and county
treasurers for all counties in which the school district has territory
pursuant to subsection (7) of section 79-458, if the combined levies,
except levies for bonded indebtedness approved by the voters of the
-11-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
school district and levies for the refinancing of such bonded
indebtedness, are in excess of the greater of (a) one dollar and twenty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) the maximum levy authorized by a vote pursuant to section
77-3444, all school district levies, except levies for bonded
indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies for
the refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, shall be considered
unauthorized levies under section 77-1606.
Sec. 4. Section 77-4211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-4211 The Property Tax Credit Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
only be used pursuant to the Property Tax Credit Act. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act. The fund terminates on the effective date of
this act, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the fund on
such date to the Education Future Fund.
Sec. 5. Section 77-4212, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4212 (1) The Property Tax Credit Act shall apply to tax years
2007 through 2025. For tax year 2007, the amount of relief granted under
the act Property Tax Credit Act shall be one hundred five million
dollars. For tax year 2008, the amount of relief granted under the act
shall be one hundred fifteen million dollars. It is the intent of the
Legislature to fund the Property Tax Credit Act for tax years after tax
year 2008 using available revenue. For tax year 2017, the amount of
relief granted under the act shall be two hundred twenty-four million
dollars. For tax year 2020 through tax year 2022, the minimum amount of
relief granted under the act shall be two hundred seventy-five million
dollars. For tax year 2023, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be three hundred sixty million dollars. For tax year 2024,
-12-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be three hundred
ninety-five million dollars. For tax year 2025, the minimum amount of
relief granted under the act shall be four hundred thirty million
dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be four hundred forty-five million dollars. For tax year
2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be four
hundred sixty million dollars. For tax year 2028, the minimum amount of
relief granted under the act shall be four hundred seventy-five million
dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be the minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a
percentage increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the
total assessed value of all real property in the state from the prior
year to the current year, as determined by the Department of Revenue,
plus an additional seventy-five million dollars. For tax year 2030 and
each tax year thereafter, the minimum amount of relief granted under the
act shall be the minimum amount from the prior tax year plus a percentage
increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the total assessed
value of all real property in the state from the prior year to the
current year, as determined by the Department of Revenue. If money is
transferred or credited to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund pursuant to
any other state law, such amount shall be added to the minimum amount
required under this subsection when determining the total amount of
relief granted under the act. The relief shall be in the form of a
property tax credit which appears on the property tax statement.
(2)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, to determine the amount
of the property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the
amount disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(a) of this section
by the ratio of the real property valuation of the parcel to the total
real property valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be the
property tax credit for the property.
(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, to determine the amount of the
-13-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
property tax credit, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount
disbursed to the county under subdivision (4)(b) of this section by the
ratio of the credit allocation valuation of the parcel to the total
credit allocation valuation in the county. The amount determined shall be
the property tax credit for the property.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the relief provided in the act to the extent of any remaining liability
after calculation of the relief provided by the homestead exemption. If
the credit results in a property tax liability on the homestead that is
less than zero, the amount of the credit which cannot be used by the
taxpayer shall be returned to the Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of
the year the amount disbursed to the county was disbursed. The Property
Tax Administrator shall immediately credit any funds returned under this
subsection to the Education Future Property Tax Credit Cash Fund. Upon
the return of any funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall
electronically file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a
form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds
distributed to each taxing unit in the county in the year the funds were
returned, any collection fee retained by the county in such year, and the
amount of unused credits returned.
(4)(a) For tax years prior to tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to
each county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement
determined under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio
of the real property valuation in the county to the real property
valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator
shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each
county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each
county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal
payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before
April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the
-14-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing
unit levying taxes on taxable property in the tax district in which the
real property is located in the same proportion that the levy of such
taxing unit bears to the total levy on taxable property of all the taxing
units in the tax district in which the real property is located.
(b) Beginning with tax year 2017, the amount disbursed to each
county shall be equal to the amount available for disbursement determined
under subsection (1) of this section multiplied by the ratio of the
credit allocation valuation in the county to the credit allocation
valuation in the state. By September 15, the Property Tax Administrator
shall determine the amount to be disbursed under this subdivision to each
county and certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to each
county. The disbursements to the counties shall occur in two equal
payments, the first on or before January 31 and the second on or before
April 1. After retaining one percent of the receipts for costs, the
county treasurer shall allocate the remaining receipts to each taxing
unit based on its share of the credits granted to all taxpayers in the
taxing unit.
(5) For purposes of this section, credit allocation valuation means
the taxable value for all real property except agricultural land and
horticultural land, one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for
agricultural land and horticultural land that is not subject to special
valuation, and one hundred twenty percent of taxable value for
agricultural land and horticultural land that is subject to special
valuation.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer from the General Fund to the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund one hundred five million dollars by August
1, 2007, and one hundred fifteen million dollars by August 1, 2008.
(7) The Legislature shall have the power to transfer funds from the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund to the General Fund.
Sec. 6. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-15-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
estimated net receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section
77-27,158, and a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
actual net receipts for the same month of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
public statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund
net receipts and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year
as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a
comparison of the actual General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to
the actual General Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year
2024-25, the Tax Commissioner shall determine:
(i) Actual General Fund net receipts for such the most recently
completed fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such
fiscal year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and
(ii) Actual General Fund net receipts for such the most recently
completed fiscal year minus one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the prior fiscal year.
(b) If the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this
section is a positive number and the amount calculated in subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section is a negative number, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified
amount to the Cash Reserve Fund.
(c) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section exceeds the amount calculated in
-16-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer the difference between the two certified numbers to the Cash
Reserve Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount certified for
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section to the School District Property
Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(d) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section is less than the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax
Commissioner shall certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer such certified amount to the School District Property Tax Relief
Credit Fund.
(4) Within fifteen days after the end of fiscal year 2025-26 and
each fiscal year thereafter, the Tax Commissioner shall determine actual
General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed fiscal year
minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal year as
certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603. If the actual General
Fund net receipts exceed the estimated General Fund net receipts for the
fiscal year, the Tax Commissioner shall certify the excess amount to the
State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified amount
to the Cash Reserve Fund.
Sec. 7. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund is
created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the School District
Property Tax Relief Act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
-17-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
million dollars from the General Fund to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) In Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26, it is the intent of the
Legislature that an amount sufficient to provide the amount of property
tax relief required by subdivision (1)(a) of section 77-7305 for each tax
year 2025 be transferred from the General Fund to the School District
Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(3) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund terminates
on the effective date of this act, and the State Treasurer shall transfer
any money in the fund on such date to the Education Future Fund.
Sec. 8. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The School District Property Tax Relief Act shall apply
to tax years year 2024 and 2025 each tax year thereafter. The property
tax relief shall be in the form of property tax credits which appear on
property tax statements. Property tax credits granted under the act shall
be credited against the amount of property taxes owed to school
districts. The total amount of property tax relief granted under the act
shall be determined as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year 2025,
the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred
eighty million dollars . For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars. For
tax year 2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall
be eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the
minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred
-18-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax
year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be the minimum amount of relief from the
prior year, excluding any additional relief provided pursuant to
subdivision (1)(b) of this section, with such amount then increased by
three percent; and
(b) If money is transferred to the School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602, such amount shall be
added to the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section when determining the total amount of relief granted under the act
for the tax year in which the transfer occurs. If no such transfer occurs
in a given tax year, the minimum amount required under subdivision (1)(a)
of this section shall be the total amount of relief granted under the act
for such tax year.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the current year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the current year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
-19-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the
Education Future School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon
the return of any funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall
electronically file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a
form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds
distributed to each school district in the county in the year the funds
were returned and the amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15, 2025 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount received under
subsection (4) of this section for costs, the county treasurer shall
disburse the remaining funds, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund shall be
used for purposes of making the disbursements to counties required under
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 9. Section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-20-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
amended to read:
79-1001 Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 and section 26 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act.
Sec. 10. Section 79-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1003 For purposes of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act:
(1) Adjusted general fund operating expenditures means (a) for
school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2026-27, the difference
of the general fund operating expenditures increased by the cost growth
factor calculated pursuant to section 79-1007.10, minus the
transportation allowance, special receipts allowance, poverty allowance,
limited English proficiency allowance, distance education and
telecommunications allowance, elementary site allowance, summer school
allowance, community achievement plan allowance, and focus school and
program allowance and (b) for school fiscal year 2026-27 and each school
fiscal year thereafter, the difference of the general fund operating
expenditures increased by the cost growth factor calculated pursuant to
section 79-1007.10, minus the transportation allowance, special receipts
allowance, poverty allowance, limited English proficiency allowance,
distance education and telecommunications allowance, elementary site
allowance, summer school allowance, and focus school and program
allowance;
(2) Adjusted valuation means the assessed valuation of taxable
property of each local system in the state, adjusted pursuant to the
adjustment factors described in section 79-1016. Adjusted valuation means
the adjusted valuation for the property tax year ending during the school
fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid
based upon that value is to be paid. For purposes of determining the
local effort rate yield pursuant to section 79-1015.01, adjusted
-21-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
valuation does not include the value of any property which a court, by a
final judgment from which no appeal is taken, has declared to be
nontaxable or exempt from taxation;
(3) Allocated income tax funds means the amount of assistance paid
to a local system pursuant to section 79-1005.01;
(4) Average daily membership means the average daily membership for
grades kindergarten through twelve attributable to the local system, as
provided in each district's annual statistical summary, and includes the
proportionate share of students enrolled in a public school instructional
program on less than a full-time basis;
(5) Base fiscal year means the first school fiscal year following
the school fiscal year in which the reorganization or unification
occurred;
(6) Board means the school board of each school district;
(7) Categorical funds means funds limited to a specific purpose by
federal or state law, including, but not limited to, Title I funds, Title
VI funds, federal career and technical education funds, federal school
lunch funds, Indian education funds, Head Start funds, and funds received
prior to July 1, 2022, from the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund;
(8) Consolidate means to voluntarily reduce the number of school
districts providing education to a grade group and does not include
dissolution pursuant to section 79-498;
(9) Converted contract means an expired contract that was in effect
for at least fifteen school years beginning prior to school year 2012-13
for the education of students in a nonresident district in exchange for
tuition from the resident district when the expiration of such contract
results in the nonresident district educating students, who would have
been covered by the contract if the contract were still in effect, as
option students pursuant to the enrollment option program established in
section 79-234;
(10) Converted contract option student means a student who will be
-22-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
an option student pursuant to the enrollment option program established
in section 79-234 for the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated and who would have been covered by a converted contract if the
contract were still in effect and such school fiscal year is the first
school fiscal year for which such contract is not in effect;
(11) Department means the State Department of Education;
(12) District means any school district or unified system as defined
in section 79-4,108;
(13) Ensuing school fiscal year means the school fiscal year
following the current school fiscal year;
(14) Equalization aid means the amount of assistance calculated to
be paid to a local system pursuant to section 79-1008.01;
(15) Fall membership means the total membership in kindergarten
through grade twelve attributable to the local system as reported on the
fall school district membership reports for each district pursuant to
section 79-528;
(16) Fiscal year means the state fiscal year which is the period
from July 1 to the following June 30;
(17) Formula students means:
(a) For state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022, the sum of
the product of fall membership from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid
multiplied by the average ratio of average daily membership to fall
membership for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid and the prior two
school fiscal years plus sixty percent of the qualified early childhood
education fall membership plus tuitioned students from the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be
paid minus the product of the number of students enrolled in kindergarten
that is not full-day kindergarten from the fall membership multiplied by
0.5; and
-23-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(b) For the final calculation of state aid pursuant to section
79-1065, the sum of average daily membership plus sixty percent of the
qualified early childhood education average daily membership plus
tuitioned students minus the product of the number of students enrolled
in kindergarten that is not full-day kindergarten from the average daily
membership multiplied by 0.5 from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which aid was paid;
(18) Free lunch and free milk calculated students means, using the
most recent data available on November 1 of the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid,
(a) for schools that did not provide free meals to all students pursuant
to the community eligibility provision, students who individually
qualified for free lunches or free milk pursuant to the federal Richard
B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., and the
federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq., as such acts
and sections existed on January 1, 2021, and rules and regulations
adopted thereunder, plus (b) for schools that provided free meals to all
students pursuant to the community eligibility provision, the greater of
the number of students in such school who individually qualified for free
lunch or free milk using the most recent school fiscal year for which the
school did not provide free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision or one hundred ten percent of the product
of the students who qualified for free meals at such school pursuant to
the community eligibility provision multiplied by the identified student
percentage calculated pursuant to such federal provision, except that the
free lunch and free milk calculated students for any school pursuant to
subdivision (18)(b) of this section shall not exceed one hundred percent
of the students qualified for free meals at such school pursuant to the
community eligibility provision;
(19) Full-day kindergarten means kindergarten offered by a district
for at least one thousand thirty-two instructional hours;
-24-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(20) General fund budget of expenditures means the total budget of
disbursements and transfers for general fund purposes as certified in the
budget statement adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, except that
for purposes of the limitation imposed in section 79-1023, the general
fund budget of expenditures does not include any special grant funds,
exclusive of local matching funds, received by a district;
(21) General fund expenditures means all expenditures from the
general fund;
(22) General fund operating expenditures means, for state aid
calculated for each school fiscal year, as reported on the annual
financial report for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, the total general fund
expenditures minus (a) the amount of all receipts to the general fund, to
the extent that such receipts are not included in local system formula
resources, from early childhood education tuition, summer school tuition,
educational entities as defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing
distance education courses through the Educational Service Unit
Coordinating Council to such educational entities, private foundations,
individuals, associations, charitable organizations, the textbook loan
program authorized by section 79-734, federal impact aid, and levy
override elections pursuant to section 77-3444, (b) the amount of
expenditures for categorical funds, tuition paid to other school
districts, tuition paid to postsecondary institutions for college credit,
transportation fees paid to other districts, adult education, community
services, redemption of the principal portion of general fund debt
service, retirement incentive plans authorized by section 79-855, and
staff development assistance authorized by section 79-856, (c) the amount
of any transfers from the general fund to any bond fund and transfers
from other funds into the general fund, (d) any legal expenses in excess
of fifteen-hundredths of one percent of the formula need for the school
fiscal year in which the expenses occurred, (e) expenditures to pay for
-25-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
incentives agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated
employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment for which
the State Board of Education approved an exclusion pursuant to
subdivision (1)(h), (i), (j), or (k) of section 79-1028.01, (f)(i)
expenditures to pay for employer contributions pursuant to subsection (2)
of section 79-958 to the School Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska to the extent that such expenditures exceed the employer
contributions under such subsection that would have been made at a
contribution rate of seven and thirty-five hundredths percent or (ii)
expenditures to pay for school district contributions pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c)(i) or (1)(d)(i) of section 79-9,113 to the retirement
system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement
Act to the extent that such expenditures exceed the school district
contributions under such subdivision that would have been made at a
contribution rate of seven and thirty-seven hundredths percent, and (g)
any amounts paid by the district for lobbyist fees and expenses reported
to the Clerk of the Legislature pursuant to section 49-1483.
For purposes of this subdivision (22) of this section, receipts from
levy override elections shall equal ninety-nine percent of the difference
of the total general fund levy minus a levy of one dollar and five cents
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation multiplied by the assessed
valuation for school districts that have voted pursuant to section
77-3444 to override the maximum levy provided pursuant to section
77-3442;
(23) Income tax liability means the amount of the reported income
tax liability for resident individuals pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable credits earned and refunds made;
(24) Income tax receipts means the amount of income tax collected
pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable
credits earned and refunds made;
(25) Limited English proficiency students means the number of
-26-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
students with limited English proficiency in a district from the most
recent data available on November 1 of the school fiscal year preceding
the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid plus the difference of
such students with limited English proficiency minus the average number
of limited English proficiency students for such district, prior to such
addition, for the three immediately preceding school fiscal years if such
difference is greater than zero;
(26) Local system means a unified system or a school district;
(27) Low-income child means a child under nineteen years of age
living in a household having an annual adjusted gross income for the
second calendar year preceding the beginning of the school fiscal year
for which aid is being calculated equal to or less than the maximum
household income pursuant to sections 9(b)(1) and 17(c)(4) of the Richard
B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1758(b)(1) and 42 U.S.C.
1766(c)(4), respectively, and sections 3(a)(6) and 4(e)(1)(A) of the
Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1772(a)(6) and 42 U.S.C. 1773(e)
(1)(A), respectively, as such acts and sections existed on January 1,
2021, for a household of that size that would have allowed the child to
meet the income qualifications for free meals during the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated;
(28) Low-income students means the number of low-income children
within the district multiplied by the ratio of the formula students in
the district divided by the total children under nineteen years of age
residing in the district as derived from income tax information;
(29) Most recently available complete data year means the most
recent single school fiscal year for which the annual financial report,
fall school district membership report, annual statistical summary,
Nebraska income tax liability by school district for the calendar year in
which the majority of the school fiscal year falls, and adjusted
valuation data are available;
-27-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(30) Poverty students means the unadjusted poverty students plus the
difference of such unadjusted poverty students minus the average number
of poverty students for such district, prior to such addition, for the
three immediately preceding school fiscal years if such difference is
greater than zero;
(31) Qualified early childhood education average daily membership
means the product of the average daily membership of students who will be
eligible or required to attend kindergarten the following school year and
are enrolled in an early childhood education program approved by the
department pursuant to section 79-1103 for such school district for such
school year multiplied by the ratio of the actual instructional hours of
the program divided by one thousand thirty-two if: (a) The program is
receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the third year; (b) the
program has already received grants pursuant to such section for three
years; or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection (5) of
section 79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school years,
including any such students in portions of any of such programs receiving
an expansion grant;
(32) Qualified early childhood education fall membership means the
product of membership on October 1 of each school year of students who
will be eligible or required to attend kindergarten the following school
year and are enrolled in an early childhood education program approved by
the department pursuant to section 79-1103 for such school district for
such school year multiplied by the ratio of the planned instructional
hours of the program divided by one thousand thirty-two if: (a) The
program is receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the third year;
(b) the program has already received grants pursuant to such section for
three years; or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection
(5) of section 79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school
years, including any such students in portions of any of such programs
receiving an expansion grant;
-28-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(33) Regular route transportation means the transportation of
students on regularly scheduled daily routes to and from the schools such
students attend;
(34) Reorganized district means any district involved in a
consolidation and currently educating students following consolidation;
(35) School year or school fiscal year means the fiscal year of a
school district as defined in section 79-1091;
(36) Sparse local system means a local system that is not a very
sparse local system but which meets the following criteria:
(a)(i) Less than two students per square mile in the county in which
each high school is located, based on the school district census, (ii)
less than one formula student per square mile in the local system, and
(iii) more than ten miles between each high school and the next closest
high school on paved roads;
(b)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square mile
in the local system and (ii) more than fifteen miles between each high
school and the next closest high school on paved roads;
(c)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square mile
in the local system and (ii) more than two hundred seventy-five square
miles in the local system; or
(d)(i) Less than two formula students per square mile in the local
system and (ii) the local system includes an area equal to ninety-five
percent or more of the square miles in the largest county in which a high
school is located in the local system;
(37) Special education means specially designed kindergarten through
grade twelve instruction pursuant to section 79-1125, and includes
special education transportation;
(38) Special grant funds means the budgeted receipts for grants,
including, but not limited to, categorical funds, reimbursements for
wards of the court, short-term borrowings including, but not limited to,
registered warrants and tax anticipation notes, interfund loans,
-29-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
insurance settlements, and reimbursements to county government for
previous overpayment. The state board shall approve a listing of grants
that qualify as special grant funds;
(39) State aid means the amount of assistance paid to a district
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(40) State board means the State Board of Education;
(41) State support means all funds provided to districts by the
State of Nebraska for the general fund support of elementary and
secondary education;
(42) Statewide average basic funding per formula student means the
statewide total basic funding for all districts divided by the statewide
total formula students for all districts;
(43) Statewide average general fund operating expenditures per
formula student means the statewide total general fund operating
expenditures for all districts divided by the statewide total formula
students for all districts;
(44) Teacher has the definition found in section 79-101;
(45) Tuition receipts from converted contracts means tuition
receipts received by a district from another district in the most
recently available complete data year pursuant to a converted contract
prior to the expiration of the contract;
(46) Tuitioned students means students in kindergarten through grade
twelve of the district whose tuition is paid by the district to some
other district or education agency;
(47) Unadjusted poverty students means the greater of the number of
low-income students or the free lunch and free milk calculated students
in a district; and
(48) Very sparse local system means a local system that has:
(a)(i) Less than one-half student per square mile in each county in
which each high school is located based on the school district census,
(ii) less than one formula student per square mile in the local system,
-30-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
and (iii) more than fifteen miles between the high school and the next
closest high school on paved roads; or
(b)(i) More than four hundred fifty square miles in the local
system, (ii) less than one-half student per square mile in the local
system, and (iii) more than fifteen miles between each high school and
the next closest high school on paved roads.
Sec. 11. Section 79-1005, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1005 (1) For school fiscal years year 2017-18 through 2025-26 and
each school fiscal year thereafter, the department shall determine the
community achievement plan aid to be paid to each school district that
will participate in a community achievement plan approved by the State
Board of Education pursuant to section 79-2122 for such school fiscal
year. For the first two school fiscal years a school district will
participate in such plan, a new community achievement plan adjustment
equal to the community achievement aid shall be included in the
calculation of formula need for such school district. For all other
school fiscal years, a community achievement plan allowance equal to the
community achievement aid shall be included in the calculation of formula
need for school districts qualifying for community achievement plan aid.
Community achievement plan aid shall be included as a formula resource
pursuant to section 79-1017.01.
(2) Community achievement plan aid shall equal 0.4643 percent of the
product of the statewide average general fund operating expenditures per
formula student multiplied by the total formula students for all of the
member school districts in such learning community. The community
achievement plan aid for each learning community shall be divided
proportionally among the member school districts based on the sum of two
percent of the poverty allowance calculated pursuant to section
79-1007.06, two percent of the limited English proficiency allowance
calculated pursuant to section 79-1007.08, and, for school districts with
-31-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
poverty students greater than forty percent of the formula students,
except as otherwise provided in this section, three percent of the
product of the statewide average general fund operating expenditures per
formula student multiplied by the difference of the poverty students
minus forty percent of the formula students for such school district.
(3) For school fiscal year 2017-18, community achievement plan aid
and a new community achievement plan adjustment shall be calculated for
school districts that are members of a learning community and shall be
included in formula resources pursuant to section 79-1017.01 in such
amount regardless of the status of the approval of a community
achievement plan, but community achievement plan aid shall not be paid to
such school districts until a community achievement plan for such
learning community is approved by the state board. If a community
achievement plan is not approved for such learning community prior to
September 1, 2017, the adjustment and aid calculated pursuant to this
section shall be removed for the final calculation of state aid pursuant
to section 79-1065 for school fiscal year 2017-18 and such amount shall
be subtracted from the state aid appropriated by the Legislature for the
determination of the local effort rate pursuant to section 79-1015.01 for
the final calculation of state aid for school fiscal year 2017-18.
(4) This section shall not apply to school fiscal year 2026-27 or
any school fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 12. Section 79-1005.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1005.01 (1) Not later than November 15 of each year through 2025,
the Tax Commissioner shall certify to the department for the preceding
tax year the income tax liability of resident individuals for each local
system.
(2) For school fiscal years prior to 2017-18, one hundred two
million two hundred eighty-nine thousand eight hundred seventeen dollars
which is equal to the amount appropriated to the School District Income
-32-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
Tax Fund for distribution in school fiscal year 1992-93 shall be
disbursed as option payments as determined under section 79-1009 and as
allocated income tax funds as determined in this section and sections
79-1008.01, 79-1015.01, 79-1017.01, and 79-1018.01. For school fiscal
years prior to school fiscal year 2017-18, funds not distributed as
allocated income tax funds due to minimum levy adjustments shall not
increase the amount available to local systems for distribution as
allocated income tax funds.
(3) Using the data certified by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall calculate the
allocation percentage and each local system's allocated income tax funds.
The allocation percentage shall be the amount stated in subsection (2) of
this section minus the total amount paid for option students pursuant to
section 79-1009, with the difference divided by the aggregate statewide
income tax liability of all resident individuals certified pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. Each local system's allocated income tax
funds shall be calculated by multiplying the allocation percentage times
the local system's income tax liability certified pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) For school fiscal years year 2017-18 through 2025-26 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, each local system’s allocated income tax
funds shall be calculated by multiplying the local system’s income tax
liability certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section by two and
twenty-three hundredths percent.
(5) This section shall not apply to school fiscal year 2026-27 or
any school fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 13. Section 79-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1006 (1) For school fiscal years year 2023-24 through 2025-26 and
each school fiscal year thereafter, the department shall determine the
foundation aid to be paid to each school district in accordance with
-33-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each
school fiscal year shall equal one thousand five hundred dollars
multiplied by the number of formula students for such school district.
(3) Twenty-four percent of the total amount of foundation aid paid
each school fiscal year shall be paid from money appropriated from the
Education Future Fund.
(4) For school fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, one hundred percent
of foundation aid shall be included as a formula resource pursuant to
section 79-1017.01. For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, sixty percent of foundation aid shall be included as a
formula resource pursuant to section 79-1017.01.
(5) This section shall not apply to school fiscal year 2026-27 or
any school fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 14. Section 79-1007.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1007.11 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section: ,
(a) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2026-27,
each school district's formula need shall equal the difference of the sum
of the school district's basic funding, poverty allowance, limited
English proficiency allowance, focus school and program allowance, summer
school allowance, special receipts allowance, transportation allowance,
elementary site allowance, distance education and telecommunications
allowance, community achievement plan allowance, averaging adjustment,
new community achievement plan adjustment, student growth adjustment, any
positive student growth adjustment correction, and new school adjustment
minus the sum of the limited English proficiency allowance correction,
poverty allowance correction, and any negative student growth adjustment
correction; and .
(b) For school fiscal year 2026-27 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, each school district's formula need shall equal the
-34-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
difference of the sum of the school district's basic funding, poverty
allowance, limited English proficiency allowance, focus school and
program allowance, summer school allowance, special receipts allowance,
transportation allowance, elementary site allowance, distance education
and telecommunications allowance, student growth adjustment, any positive
student growth adjustment correction, and new school adjustment minus the
sum of the limited English proficiency allowance correction, poverty
allowance correction, and any negative student growth adjustment
correction.
(2) If the formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section is less than one hundred percent of the
formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the
formula need for such district shall equal one hundred percent of the
formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.
(3) If the formula need calculated for a school district pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section is more than one hundred twelve percent of
the formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated, the
formula need for such district shall equal one hundred twelve percent of
the formula need for such district for the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated,
except that the formula need shall not be reduced pursuant to this
subsection for any district receiving a student growth adjustment for the
school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.
(4) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
formula need for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the school
fiscal year for which aid is being calculated shall be the formula need
used in the final calculation of aid pursuant to section 79-1065 and for
districts that were affected by a reorganization with an effective date
-35-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
in the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which aid is
certified for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated,
the formula need for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated shall be attributed
to the affected school districts based on information provided to the
department by the school districts or proportionally based on the
adjusted valuation transferred if sufficient information has not been
provided to the department.
Sec. 15. Section 79-1007.18, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1007.18 (1) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year
2017-18:
(a) The department shall calculate an averaging adjustment for
districts if the basic funding per formula student is less than the
averaging adjustment threshold and the general fund levy for the school
fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is
being calculated was at least one dollar per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation. For the calculation of aid for school fiscal years
prior to school fiscal year 2018-19, the general fund levy for school
districts that are members of a learning community for purposes of this
section includes both the common general fund levy and the school
district general fund levy authorized pursuant to subdivisions (2)(b) and
(2)(c) of section 77-3442. The averaging adjustment shall equal the
district's formula students multiplied by the percentage specified in
this subsection for such district of the difference between the averaging
adjustment threshold minus such district's basic funding per formula
student;
(b) The averaging adjustment threshold shall equal the aggregate
basic funding for all districts with nine hundred or more formula
students divided by the aggregate formula students for all districts with
nine hundred or more formula students for the school fiscal year for
-36-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
which aid is being calculated; and
(c) The percentage to be used in the calculation of an averaging
adjustment shall be based on the general fund levy for the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated and shall be as follows:
(i) If such levy was at least one dollar per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation but less than one dollar and one cent per one hundred
dollars of taxable valuation, the percentage shall be fifty percent;
(ii) If such levy was at least one dollar and one cent per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation but less than one dollar and two
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation, the percentage shall
be sixty percent;
(iii) If such levy was at least one dollar and two cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation but less than one dollar and three
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation, the percentage shall
be seventy percent;
(iv) If such levy was at least one dollar and three cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation but less than one dollar and four
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation, the percentage shall
be eighty percent; and
(v) If such levy was at least one dollar and four cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation, the percentage shall be ninety
percent.
(2) For school fiscal years year 2017-18 through 2025-26 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, the department shall calculate an
averaging adjustment for districts with at least nine hundred formula
students if the basic funding per formula student is less than the
averaging adjustment threshold. The averaging adjustment shall equal the
district's formula students multiplied by ninety percent of the
difference of the averaging adjustment threshold minus such district's
basic funding per formula student. The averaging adjustment threshold
-37-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
shall equal the aggregate basic funding for all districts with nine
hundred or more formula students divided by the aggregate formula
students for all districts with nine hundred or more formula students for
the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.
(3) This section shall not apply to school fiscal year 2026-27 or
any school fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 16. Section 79-1008.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1008.01 (1) Each local system shall receive equalization aid in
an amount equal to the preliminary equalization aid amount for the local
system, as determined pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, minus
the base levy adjustment for such local system, as determined pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The local system's preliminary equalization aid amount shall be
the greater of:
(a) The local system's total formula need, as determined pursuant to
section 79-1007.11, minus its total formula resources, as determined
pursuant to section 79-1017.01; or
(b) The local system's basic funding, as determined pursuant to
section 79-1007.16, multiplied by thirty percent.
(3)(a) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) The base levy shall be equal to thirty cents per one hundred
dollars of taxable valuation;
(ii) The potential general fund levy for the ensuing school fiscal
year shall be equal to the general fund levy for the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which equalization aid
is being calculated plus the potential general fund levy change
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(iii) of this section; and
(iii) The potential general fund levy change shall be equal to:
(A) For school fiscal year 2026-27, the difference between the
amount of state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022 for the school
-38-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which
equalization aid is being calculated and the preliminary equalization aid
amount calculated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for the
ensuing school fiscal year divided by the total taxable value of the
local system and multiplied by one hundred; and
(B) For school fiscal year 2027-28 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the difference between the amount of equalization aid for the
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which
equalization aid is being calculated and the preliminary equalization aid
amount calculated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for the
ensuing school fiscal year divided by the total taxable value of the
local system and multiplied by one hundred.
(b) The local system's base levy adjustment shall be equal to the
base levy minus the potential general fund levy for the ensuing school
fiscal year, with the difference then multiplied by the total taxable
value of the local system and divided by one hundred. If the amount
calculated for a local system under this subsection is a negative number,
the base levy adjustment for such local system shall be zero. in the
amount that the total formula need, as determined pursuant to section
79-1007.11, exceeds its total formula resources, as determined pursuant
to section 79-1017.01. The equalization aid for a local system shall be
zero if the total formula resources equals or exceeds the total formula
need for such local system.
Sec. 17. Section 79-1009, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1009 (1)(a) A district shall receive net option funding if (i)
option students as defined in section 79-233 were actually enrolled in
the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the aid is
to be paid, (ii) option students as defined in such section will be
enrolled in the school year in which the aid is to be paid as converted
contract option students, or (iii) for the calculation of aid for school
-39-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
fiscal year 2017-18 for school districts that are members of a learning
community, open enrollment students were actually enrolled for school
year 2016-17 pursuant to section 79-2110.
(b) The determination of the net number of option students shall be
based on (i) the number of students enrolled in the district as option
students and the number of students residing in the district but enrolled
in another district as option students as of the day of the fall
membership count pursuant to section 79-528, for the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid,
(ii) the number of option students that will be enrolled in the district
or enrolled in another district as converted contract option students for
the fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid, and (iii) for the
calculation of aid for school fiscal year 2017-18 for school districts
that are members of a learning community, the number of students enrolled
in the district as open enrollment students and the number of students
residing in the district but enrolled in another district as open
enrollment students as of the day of the fall membership count pursuant
to section 79-528 for school fiscal year 2016-17.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, net number of
option students means the difference of the number of option students
enrolled in the district minus the number of students residing in the
district but enrolled in another district as option students. For
purposes of the calculation of aid for school fiscal year 2017-18 for
school districts that are members of a learning community, net number of
option students means the difference of the number of students residing
in another school district who are option students or open enrollment
students enrolled in the district minus the number of students residing
in the district but enrolled in another district as option students or
open enrollment students.
(2)(a) For school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2023-24,
net option funding shall be the product of the net number of option
-40-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
students multiplied by the statewide average basic funding per formula
student.
(b) For school fiscal years year 2023-24 through 2025-26 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, net option funding shall be the product of
the net number of option students multiplied by the difference of the
statewide average basic funding per formula student minus the amount of
foundation aid paid per formula student pursuant to section 79-1006.
(c) For school fiscal year 2026-27 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, net option funding shall be the product of the net number of
option students multiplied by the statewide average basic funding per
formula student.
(3) A district's net option funding shall be zero if the calculation
produces a negative result.
Payments made under this section for school fiscal years prior to
school fiscal year 2017-18 shall be made from the funds to be disbursed
under section 79-1005.01.
Such payments shall go directly to the option school district but
shall count as a formula resource for the local system.
Sec. 18. Section 79-1016, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1016 (1) On or before August 20, the county assessor shall
certify to the Property Tax Administrator the total taxable value by
school district in the county for the current assessment year on forms
prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The county assessor may amend the
filing for changes made to the taxable valuation of the school district
in the county if corrections or errors on the original certification are
discovered. Amendments shall be certified to the Property Tax
Administrator on or before August 31.
(2) On or before October 10, the Property Tax Administrator shall
compute and certify to the State Department of Education the adjusted
valuation for the current assessment year for each class of property in
-41-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
each school district and each local system. The adjusted valuation of
property for each school district and each local system, for purposes of
determining state aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act, shall reflect as nearly as possible state aid
value as defined in subsection (3) of this section. The Property Tax
Administrator shall notify each school district and each local system of
its adjusted valuation for the current assessment year by class of
property on or before October 10. Establishment of the adjusted valuation
shall be based on the taxable value certified by the county assessor for
each school district in the county adjusted by the determination of the
level of value for each school district from an analysis of the
comprehensive assessment ratio study or other studies developed by the
Property Tax Administrator, in compliance with professionally accepted
mass appraisal techniques, as required by section 77-1327. The Tax
Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting
forth standards for the determination of level of value for state aid
purposes.
(3) For purposes of this section, state aid value means:
(a) For the calculation of state aid to be paid in school fiscal
years prior to school fiscal year 2026-27:
(i) Ninety-six percent of actual value for real property other than
agricultural and horticultural land;
(ii) Seventy-two percent of actual value as provided in sections
77-1359 and 77-1363 for agricultural and horticultural land;
(iii) Seventy-two percent of special valuation as defined in section
77-1343 for agricultural and horticultural land that receives special
valuation pursuant to section 77-1344; and
(iv) The net book value as defined in section 77-120 for personal
property; and
(b) For the calculation of state aid to be paid in school fiscal
year 2026-27 and each school fiscal year thereafter:
-42-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(i) Eighty-six percent of actual value for real property other than
agricultural and horticultural land;
(ii) Forty-two percent of actual value as provided in sections
77-1359 and 77-1363 for agricultural and horticultural land;
(iii) Forty-two percent of special valuation as defined in section
77-1343 for agricultural and horticultural land that receives special
valuation pursuant to section 77-1344; and
(iv) The net book value as defined in section 77-120 for personal
property.
(a) For real property other than agricultural and horticultural
land, ninety-six percent of actual value;
(b) For agricultural and horticultural land, seventy-two percent of
actual value as provided in sections 77-1359 to 77-1363. For agricultural
and horticultural land that receives special valuation pursuant to
section 77-1344, seventy-two percent of special valuation as defined in
section 77-1343; and
(c) For personal property, the net book value as defined in section
77-120.
(4) On or before November 10, any local system may file with the Tax
Commissioner written objections to the adjusted valuations prepared by
the Property Tax Administrator, stating the reasons why such adjusted
valuations are not the valuations required by subsection (3) of this
section. The Tax Commissioner shall fix a time for a hearing. Either
party shall be permitted to introduce any evidence in reference thereto.
On or before January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall enter a written order
modifying or declining to modify, in whole or in part, the adjusted
valuations and shall certify the order to the State Department of
Education. Modification by the Tax Commissioner shall be based upon the
evidence introduced at hearing and shall not be limited to the
modification requested in the written objections or at hearing. A copy of
the written order shall be mailed to the local system within seven days
-43-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
after the date of the order. The written order of the Tax Commissioner
may be appealed within thirty days after the date of the order to the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013.
(5) On or before November 10, any local system or county official
may file with the Tax Commissioner a written request for a nonappealable
correction of the adjusted valuation due to clerical error as defined in
section 77-128 or, for agricultural and horticultural land, assessed
value changes by reason of land qualified or disqualified for special use
valuation pursuant to sections 77-1343 to 77-1347.01. On or before the
following January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall approve or deny the
request and, if approved, certify the corrected adjusted valuations
resulting from such action to the State Department of Education.
(6) On or before May 31 of the year following the certification of
adjusted valuation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, any local
system or county official may file with the Tax Commissioner a written
request for a nonappealable correction of the adjusted valuation due to
changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of taxable
property. Upon the filing of the written request, the Tax Commissioner
shall require the county assessor to recertify the taxable valuation by
school district in the county on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. The recertified valuation shall be the valuation that was
certified on the tax list, pursuant to section 77-1613, increased or
decreased by changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of
taxable property in the school district in the county in the prior
assessment year. On or before the following July 31, the Tax Commissioner
shall approve or deny the request and, if approved, certify the corrected
adjusted valuations resulting from such action to the State Department of
Education.
(7) No injunction shall be granted restraining the distribution of
state aid based upon the adjusted valuations pursuant to this section.
(8) A school district whose state aid is to be calculated pursuant
-44-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
to subsection (5) of this section and whose state aid payment is
postponed as a result of failure to calculate state aid pursuant to such
subsection may apply to the state board for lump-sum payment of such
postponed state aid. Such application may be for any amount up to one
hundred percent of the postponed state aid. The state board may grant the
entire amount applied for or any portion of such amount. The state board
shall notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of
funds to be paid in a lump sum and the reduced amount of the monthly
payments. The Director of Administrative Services shall, at the time of
the next state aid payment made pursuant to section 79-1022, draw a
warrant for the lump-sum amount from appropriated funds and forward such
warrant to the district.
Sec. 19. Section 79-1017.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1017.01 (1) For state aid calculated for each school fiscal year
prior to school fiscal year 2023-24, local system formula resources
includes other actual receipts determined pursuant to section 79-1018.01,
net option funding determined pursuant to section 79-1009, allocated
income tax funds determined pursuant to section 79-1005.01, and community
achievement plan aid determined pursuant to section 79-1005, and is
reduced by amounts paid by the district in the most recently available
complete data year as property tax refunds pursuant to or in the manner
prescribed by section 77-1736.06.
(2) For state aid calculated for school fiscal years year 2023-24
through 2025-26 and each school fiscal year thereafter, local system
formula resources includes other actual receipts determined pursuant to
section 79-1018.01, net option funding determined pursuant to section
79-1009, allocated income tax funds determined pursuant to section
79-1005.01, community achievement plan aid determined pursuant to section
79-1005, and a percentage of foundation aid determined pursuant to
section 79-1006, and is reduced by amounts paid by the district in the
-45-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
most recently available complete data year as property tax refunds
pursuant to or in the manner prescribed by section 77-1736.06.
(3) For state aid calculated for school fiscal year 2026-27 and each
school fiscal year thereafter, local system formula resources includes
other actual receipts determined pursuant to section 79-1018.01 and net
option funding determined pursuant to section 79-1009, and is reduced by
amounts paid by the district in the most recently available complete data
year as property tax refunds pursuant to or in the manner prescribed by
section 77-1736.06.
Sec. 20. Section 79-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1021 (1) The Education Future Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department and shall consist of money transferred to
the fund by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the Education
Future Fund to the Computer Science and Technology Education Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Education Future Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used only for the following purposes, in order
of priority:
(a) To fully fund equalization aid under the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(b) To fund reimbursements related to special education under
section 79-1142;
(c) To fund foundation aid under the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act for school fiscal years 2023-24 through
2025-26;
(d) To increase funding for school districts in a way that results
in direct property tax relief, which means a dollar-for-dollar
replacement of property taxes by a state funding source;
-46-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(e) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to address teacher turnover rates and keep existing teachers
in classrooms;
(f) To provide funding to increase career and technical educational
classroom opportunities for students, including, but not limited to,
computer science education. Such funding must provide students with the
academic and technical skills, knowledge, and training necessary to
succeed in future careers;
(g) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to provide students the opportunity to have a mentor who will
continuously engage with the student directly to aid in the student's
professional growth and give ongoing support and encouragement to the
student;
(h) To provide funding for extraordinary increases in special
education expenditures to allow school districts with large, unexpected
special education expenditures to more easily meet the needs of all
students;
(i) To provide funding to help recruit teachers throughout the state
by utilizing apprenticeships through a teacher apprenticeship program and
an alternative certification process;
(j) To provide funding to develop and implement a professional
learning system to help provide sustained professional learning and
training regarding evidence-based reading instruction and for a grant
program relating to dyslexia research; and
(k) To provide funding for a pilot project administered by the State
Department of Education to provide menstrual products to school
districts.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer one billion dollars from
the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2023-24, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
-47-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty million
dollars from the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year
2024-25, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that two hundred fifty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Education
Future Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter.
(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(i) XX billion XX million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2026-27;
(ii) XX billion XX million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2027-28;
(iii) XX billion XX million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2028-29; and
(iv) XX billion XX million dollars be transferred from the General
Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2029-30.
Sec. 21. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2026 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2026 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
-48-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 22. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2026-27 2023-24 are null and void.
Sec. 23. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2026 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
-49-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
to such student growth adjustment.
Sec. 24. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
Average daily Allowable
-50-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
membership of reserve
district percentage
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2026 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 25. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2026 2023, and on or
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 26. For fiscal year 2026-27 and each fiscal year thereafter,
if the amount of money transferred from the General Fund to the Education
Future Fund does not equal the amounts described in subdivision (3)(d) of
section 79-1021 and is insufficient for any fiscal year to fully fund
equalization aid under the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
-51-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
Support Act, each school district may, if approved by a majority vote of
the school board, levy an amount for such fiscal year sufficient to
generate revenue equal to the amount of equalization aid that should have
been provided to the school district for such fiscal year. The property
tax levy provided in this section is in addition to the maximum allowable
property tax levy described in subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442.
Sec. 27. Section 79-10,120, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,120 (1) The school board or board of education of any school
district may establish a special fund for purposes of acquiring sites for
school buildings or teacherages, purchasing existing buildings for use as
school buildings or teacherages, including the sites upon which such
buildings are located, and the erection, alteration, equipping, and
furnishing of school buildings or teacherages and additions to school
buildings for elementary and high school grades and for no other purpose.
The fund shall be established from the proceeds of an annual levy, to be
determined by the board. The maximum levy under this section shall be:
(a) For fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2026-27, fourteen cents
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the
levy; and
(b) For fiscal year 2026-27 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy, except that the maximum levy shall be fourteen cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy for
any project commenced prior to the effective date of this act.
(2) The tax authorized in this section , of not to exceed fourteen
cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all taxable
property in the district which shall be in addition to any other taxes
authorized to be levied for school purposes. Such tax shall be levied and
collected as are other taxes for school purposes. For fiscal year 2026-27
and each fiscal year thereafter, such tax shall not be subject to the
-52-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
levy limitation provided in subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442.
Sec. 28. Section 79-3402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3402 For purposes of the School District Property Tax Limitation
Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Approved bonds means (a) bonds that are issued by a school
district after the question of issuing such bonds has been approved by
the voters of such school district and (b) bonds that are issued by a
school district pursuant to section 79-10,110, 79-10,110.01, or
79-10,110.02;
(2) Average daily membership has the same meaning as in section
79-1003;
(3) Base growth percentage means the sum of:
(a) Three percent;
(b) The annual percentage increase in the student enrollment of the
school district multiplied by:
(i) One if the school district's student enrollment has grown by an
average of at least three percent and by at least one hundred fifty
students over the preceding three years;
(ii) Seven-tenths if the school district's student enrollment has
grown by an average of at least three percent over the preceding three
years; or
(iii) Four-tenths if subdivisions (3)(b)(i) and (3)(b)(ii) of this
section do not apply;
(c) The percentage obtained by first dividing the annual increase in
the total number of limited English proficiency students in the school
district by the student enrollment of the school district and then
multiplying the quotient by fifteen hundredths; and
(d) The percentage obtained by first dividing the annual increase in
the total number of poverty students in the school district by the
student enrollment of the school district and then multiplying the
-53-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
quotient by fifteen hundredths;
(4) Department means the State Department of Education;
(5) Non-property-tax revenue means revenue of a school district from
all state and local sources other than real and personal property taxes.
Non-property-tax revenue does not include grants, donations, bonds, all
revenue from a school district that has been merged into another school
district or dissolved, activity funds, bond funds, cooperative funds,
depreciation funds, employee benefit funds, nutrition funds, qualified
capital purpose undertaking funds, or student fee funds, insurance
proceeds, proceeds from the sale of property including land, buildings,
or capital assets in special building funds, or proceeds of financing;
(6) Property tax request means the total amount of property taxes
for the general fund and special building funds requested to be raised
for a school district through the levy imposed pursuant to section
77-1601;
(7) Property tax request authority means the amount that may be
included in a property tax request for the general fund or special
building funds of the school district as determined pursuant to the
School District Property Tax Limitation Act;
(8) School board has the same meaning as in section 79-101;
(9) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101; and
(10) Student enrollment means the total number of students in the
school district according to the fall school district membership report
described in subsection (4) of section 79-528.
Sec. 29. Section 79-3403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3403 (1) Except as provided in sections 79-3404 and 79-3405, a
school district's property tax request for any year shall not exceed the
school district's property tax request authority.
(2) The department shall calculate each school district's property
tax request authority on an annual basis as follows:
-54-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
(a) The school district's property tax request from the prior year
shall be added to the non-property-tax revenue from the prior year minus
any investment income from special building funds from the prior year,
and the total shall be increased by the school district's base growth
percentage; and
(b) The amount determined under subdivision (2)(a) of this section
shall then be decreased by the amount of total non-property-tax revenue
for the current year and adjusted for any known or documented errors in
documentation received by the department from the school district. In
determining the total non-property-tax revenue for the current year, any
category of non-property-tax revenue for which there is insufficient data
as of June 1 to make an accurate determination shall be deemed to be
equal to the prior year's amount.
(3) The department shall certify the amount determined for each
school district under this section to the school board of such school
district. Such certified amount shall be the school district's property
tax request authority.
Sec. 30. Section 79-3406, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3406 A school district may choose not to increase its property
tax request by the full amount allowed by the school district's property
tax request authority in a particular year. In such cases, the school
district may carry forward to future years the amount of unused property
tax request authority, excluding any unused amounts obtained pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 79-3405. The department shall calculate each
school district's unused property tax request authority and shall submit
an accounting of such amount to the school board of the school district.
Such unused property tax request authority may then be used in later
years for increases in the school district's property tax request.
Sec. 31. Original sections 9-1204, 77-4211, 79-1001, 79-1003,
79-1005, 79-1005.01, 79-1006, 79-1007.11, 79-1007.18, 79-1008.01,
-55-

LB1038 LB1038
2026 2026
79-1009, 79-1016, 79-1017.01, 79-1021, 79-1022, 79-1022.02, 79-1023,
79-1027, 79-1031.01, 79-10,120, 79-3402, 79-3403, and 79-3406, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 77-3012 and 77-4212, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-3442, 77-4602,
77-7304, and 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 32. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-56-